Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Chapter 1 General Provisions

§ 37-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in chapters 1, 2, 3, 12, 17 and 18 of this title:

“Commission” means public service commission of Wyoming, which is created and established by this chapter;

“Commissioner” means any one of the members of the Wyoming public service commission;

“Municipality” when used in this chapter shall mean and include any town, village, city, county or other political subdivision of this state;

“Municipal council” means and includes the city council, common council, board of aldermen, the board of selectmen, the board of trustees, the city commission or any other governing body of any political subdivision of the state;

“Person” means and includes individuals, associations of individuals, firms, partnerships, companies, corporations, their lessees, trustees, or receivers, appointed by any court whatsoever in the singular number, as well as the plural;

“Public utility” means and includes every person that owns, operates, leases, controls or has power to operate, lease or control:

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 104.

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 181, § 3.

Any plant, property or facility for the generation, transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing to or for the public of electricity for light, heat or power, including any conduits, ducts or other devices, materials, apparatus or property for containing, holding or carrying conductors used or to be used for the transmission of electricity for light, heat or power;

Any plant, property or facility for the manufacture, distribution, sale or furnishing to or for the public of natural or manufactured gas for lights, heat or power;

Any plant, property or facility for the supply, storage, distribution or furnishing to or for the public of water for manufacturing, municipal, agriculture or domestic uses, except and excluding any such plant, property or facility owned by a municipality;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 104.

Any plant, property or equipment for the transportation or conveyance to or for the public of oil or gas by pipeline, or any plant, property, or equipment, used for the purpose of transporting, selling or furnishing natural gas to any consumer or consumers within the state of Wyoming for industrial, commercial or residential use, except any such plant, property or equipment used for any of the following purposes is exempted from this and all other provisions of this chapter to the extent of such use:

For the transportation or sale of natural gas within or between oil and gas fields or potential oil and gas fields for residential, commercial, industrial or other use reasonably necessary in the exploration, development or operation of the field;

For drilling, producing, repressuring, or other oil or gas field operations;

For operation of natural gas processing plants;

For the sale of natural gas by the producer to a consumer for use in industrial or commercial plants or establishments of any kind or nature.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to:

Interstate commerce except when a regulatory field has not been preempted by the United States government;

To public utilities owned and operated by a municipality of the state of Wyoming or owned and operated by a joint powers entity formed pursuant to the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

, and comprised of two (2) or more municipalities, except as to that portion of a municipality owned and operated public utility or joint powers entity owned and operated public utility, if any, as may extend services outside the corporate limits of a municipality and except that if any municipal or joint powers utility owns an undivided interest in a facility for the production of electricity which is also partly owned by an agency subject to the jurisdiction of the public service commission, the sale of electricity in excess of the participating municipalities’ or joint powers entities’ need is subject to this act;

To farmers’ mutual telephone associations having no capital stock and furnishing service to members of associations only and without tolls, except as provided in W.S.

37-2-205

;

To mutual water companies or associations having no capital stock and furnishing water service to members of companies or associations only, and without charges other than assessments of members to reimburse companies or associations for expenses incurred in their establishment or operation;

To any person who is not otherwise affiliated with a utility, that owns, leases, controls or has power to lease or control any plant, property or facility which, in a transaction approved or authorized by the commission, is leased to one (1) or more public utilities, and is to be operated by the lessee or lessees for the generation, transmission, distribution, sale or furnishing to or for the public of electricity for light, heat, power or other utility purposes;

To the generation, transmission or distribution of electricity, or to the manufacture or distribution of gas, or to the furnishing or distribution of water, nor to the production, delivery or furnishing of steam or any other substance, by a producer or other person, for the sole use of a producer or other person, or for the use of tenants of a producer or other person and not for sale to others. Such exemptions shall not apply to metered or other direct sales of a utility commodity by a producer or other person to his tenants;

The retail sale of compressed natural gas for use as motor vehicle fuel by a person that is not otherwise regulated under this title;

Metered and other direct sales of water by a person to his tenants when the metered or other direct sales are solely for purposes of allocating usage among tenants and includes no additional fees or charges;

Metered and other direct sales of water by a person operating a water system that:

Has less than fifteen (15) potential service connections;

Is not owned, controlled or otherwise affiliated with a water utility or any other utility that provides water service;

Is not a centralized water supply system associated with a subdivision; and

Is not located within the established service territory of a water utility or the corporate limits of a municipality.

The retail sale of electricity for charging electric vehicles by a person that is not otherwise regulated under this title.

The term “public utility” shall mean and include two (2) or more public utilities rendering joint service;

Any person furnishing coal, water or other raw materials to an electric power company shall not by this fact alone be designated as a public utility;

The provisions of W.S.

37-6-101

through

37-6-106

, relating to the issuance and sale of securities shall not apply to:

Any gas pipeline corporation making direct sales to Wyoming consumers in interstate commerce and not for resale;

Any cooperative electrical generation and transmission association operating in interstate commerce whose rates are not regulated by the Wyoming public service commission.

The provisions of W.S.

37-18-101

and

37-18-102

shall not apply to any public utility owned or operated by a municipality or any cooperative electrical generation and transmission association operating in interstate commerce whose rates are not regulated by the Wyoming public service commission.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 1; 1917, ch. 74, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5453; Laws 1925, ch. 150, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 94-101; C.S. 1945, § 64-101; Laws 1955, ch. 154, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-1; Laws 1961, ch. 88, § 1; ch. 157, §§ 1, 2; ch. 230, § 1; 1971, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; ch. 202, § 1; 1973, ch. 243, § 1; 1976, ch. 28, § 2; 1978, ch. 9, § 1; 1989, ch. 127, § 2; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1995, ch. 181, § 3; ch. 192, § 2; 2007, ch. 165, § 2; 2012, ch. 84, § 104; 2013 ch. 182, § 1, effective March 13, 2013; 2015 ch. 151, § 1, effective March 5, 2015; 2018 ch. 55, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 147, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 70, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to requirement that electric utilities use a net metering program, see chapter 16 of this title.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “chapters 1, 2, 3, 12 and 17” for
“chapters 1, 2, 3 and 12” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (a)(vi)(A), which read: “Any plant, property or facility for the transportation or conveyance to or for the public of passengers or property for hire, except taxicabs operating solely in cities and towns”; and repealed former (a)(vi)(F), which read: “Any plant, property or facility for the production, transmission, conveyance, delivery or furnishing to or for the public of steam or any other substance for heat or power.”

The 2013 amendment

added new (a)(vi)(H)(VII).

Laws 2013, ch. 182, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 13, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

added (a)(vi)(H)(VIII).

Laws 2015, ch. 151, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2015.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
in (a)(vi)(H)(II), inserted “or owned and operated by a joint
powers entity whose individual member entities are authorized by
law
to provide utility service and are formed pursuant to the Wyoming
Joint Powers Act, W.S.

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

, and comprised of
two (2) or more municipalities” preceding “except as
to that portion,” “or joint powers entity owned and
operated public utility” following “operated public
utility,” “or joint powers” preceding “utility
owns an undivided,” and “or joint powers entities’”
preceding “need is subject to this act.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 118, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(vi)(H)(II), substituted “joint powers entity formed” for “joint powers entity whose individual member entities are authorized by law to provide utility service and are formed.”

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 147, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added (a)(vi)(H)(IX).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “12, 17 and 18” for “12 and 17”; and added (a)(vi)(N).

The 2022 amendment

substituted “person that” for “company which” in (a)(vi)(H)(VII); and added (a)(vi)(H)(X).

Laws 2022, ch. 70, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subparagraph (a)(vi)(I) or (a)(vi)(L), or subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this chapter.” —

The term “this chapter,” referred to near the beginning of the first sentence in subsection (a)(vi)(H), means Laws 1976, ch. 28, which appears as §§

15-7-202

,

16-1-105

through

16-1-108

and this section.

Commission cannot order interstate carrier to file tariff based on total billings. —

Since interstate telecommunications service is normally outside the reach of state commissions and within the exclusive jurisdiction of the federal communications commission, the Wyoming public service commission could not lawfully order an interstate carrier to file a tariff based on its total billings, which included interstate calls. AT & T Communications of Mountain States, Inc. v. Public Service Com., 625 F. Supp. 1204, 1985 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13499 (D. Wyo. 1985).

Authority over utilities outside corporate limits. —

At no time in the statutory history of municipal ownership and operation of an electric utility has a Wyoming city or town had authority to grant or deny the right to any utility to serve areas outside its corporate limits, as that jurisdiction has been and still is solely vested in the public service commission. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) (2015), the Public Service Commission has general and exclusive power to regulate utility services, except to the limited extent that a municipality provides such services to customers within its corporate limits. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Legislature granted a city the authority to provide electricity to customers outside the city limits via Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-7-201

(2015), but reserved the authority to determine an appropriate rate for the service provided outside the city limits to the Public Service Commission (PSC) in Wyo. Stat Ann. §§

37-2-112

, 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C) and (a)(vi)(H)(II) (2015). The language of § 37-1-101(a)(vi)(H)(II) unambiguously grants the PSC exclusive regulatory power over all municipally-owned public utility services provided to customers outside the municipality's corporate limits. City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Oil producing company. —

Oil producing company, in pursuance of contracts with owners of fee and leaseholds to produce oil from their several properties for them respectively, furnishing electric current, telephone use and transportation in production of oil, did not constitute a “public utility” corporation within Selective Sales Tax Act, §

39-6-401

et seq. (now see §

39-15-101

et seq.) State Bd. of Equalization v. Stanolind Oil & Gas Co., 54 Wyo. 521, 94 P.2d 147,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1939).

Mutual companies. —

An electrical corporation not organized for gain, having no capital stock, but organized to furnish electricity to its members only is a public utility and liable for 2% excise tax on amount paid to public utilities. Rural Elec. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 451, 120 P.2d 741,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1942).

“Maintain” and “regulate.” —

Power of municipality to “maintain” and “regulate” electric plant must be exercised in the exclusive method prescribed by the statutes. Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

The public utilities laws refer only to intrastate business,

rather than interstate business. Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Once established that proposed commerce is exclusively interstate, the Wyoming public service commission cannot regulate it in such a manner as to unduly or substantially burden the free flow thereof. Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

All public utilities in Wyoming are deemed common carriers.

Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Radio common carriers

are public utilities as defined by this section. In re Appeal of Williams, 626 P.2d 564,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 320

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 896, 102 S. Ct. 394, 70 L. Ed. 2d 211, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 3948 (U.S. 1981).

Private sewage disposal companies are not within definition of “public utility”

provided by subsection (a)(vi)(E) and are not therefore subject to the commission's regulatory authority under §

37-2-112

.Public Serv. Comm'n v. Formal Complaint of WWZ Co., 641 P.2d 183,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1982).

Certificate of convenience and necessity not required from non-public utility company. —

In a condemnation case under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 32 and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-815

, by a power company, a certificate of convenience and necessity under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

37-2-205

and

1-26-816

was not required because the company was not a ‘public utility’ as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann § 37-1-101(a)(vi) in that the company supplied wholesale power to an energy corporation that in turn sold it to its members. Bridle Bit Ranch Co. v. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 2005 WY 108, 118 P.3d 996,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 2005).

The public in paragraph (a) (vi) (G)

means the citizenry or consumers of Wyoming. Continental Pipe Line Co. v. Belle Fourche Pipeline Co., 372 F. Supp. 1333, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 9294 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Sale of gas to a wholesaler was not “to and for the public use.” Phillips Petroleum Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 545 P.2d 1167,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1976).

The public service commission could not assert jurisdiction over a petroleum company upon the basis of the fact that it sold gas to a gas wholesaler as a consumer, where the wholesaler in no manner used, utilized, diminished, destroyed or even converted this gas to any other form, and was not in the contemplation of the word “consumer” as above defined but was a mere purchaser of this gas. Phillips Petroleum Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 545 P.2d 1167,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1976).

The words “consumer” and “public” must be read and construed only in their commercial sense to arrive at the proper decision with respect to the power and jurisdiction of the public service commission. Phillips Petroleum Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 545 P.2d 1167,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1976).

Pass-through rate increase properly granted to rural cooperative following increase in federal rates. —

A pass-through rate increase was properly granted to a rural electric distribution cooperative following an increase in the wholesale electric rates of a federal power marketing agency from which the rural cooperative purchased the majority of its power, as the public service commission is preempted by the federal government from reviewing the reasonableness of the components of interstate wholesale electric rates, but the commission can accept the federally approved rate as given and decline to require Wyoming distribution utilities to prove that such rates are just and reasonable under Wyoming ratemaking law and standards. Spence v. Smyth, 686 P.2d 597,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 333

(Wyo. 1984).

Applied

in

In re Hamilton Pipe Line Co., 65 Wyo. 350, 202 P.2d 184,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1949); Frank v. City of Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977); Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Badley v. City of Sheridan, 513 P.2d 647,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1973); US West Communs. v. Wyoming PSC, 15 P.3d 722,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 228

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1929); Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974); RT Communs., Inc. v. PSC, 2003 WY 145, 79 P.3d 36,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2003); Box L Corp. v. Teton County, 2004 WY 75, 92 P.3d 811,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “State Level Transportation Management,” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 701 (1971).

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mutual association, nonprofit organization, or cooperative as under duty to furnish utilities services, 56 ALR2d 413.

Community antenna television systems (CATV) as subject to jurisdiction of state public utility or service commission, 61 ALR3d 1150.

State regulation of radio paging services, 44 ALR4th 216.

§ 37-1-102.
“Rate” and “service regulation” defined.

The term “rate”, when used in this act, shall mean and include, in the plural number, as well as in the singular, every individual or joint rate, classification, fare, toll, charge or other compensation for service rendered or to be rendered by any public utility, and every rule, regulation, practice, act, requirement or privilege in any way relating to such rate, fare, toll, charge or other compensation, and any schedule or tariff or part of a schedule or tariff thereof.

The term “service regulation” shall mean and include every rule, regulation, practice, act or requirement in any way relating to the service or facilities of a public utility.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 146, § 2; 1917, ch. 74, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 5454; R.S. 1931, § 94-102; C.S. 1945, § 64-102; W.S. 1957, § 37-2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The words “this act” in subsection (a) apparently refer to ch. 146, Laws 1915.

Applied

in

Mountain States Tel. & Tel. Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 745 P.2d 563,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1987).

Quoted

in

Pacific Power & Light Co. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 677 P.2d 799,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 259

(Wyo. 1984); MGTC, Inc. v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 735 P.2d 103,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 433

(Wyo. 1987); Tri-State Generation & Transmission Ass'n v. Wyoming Pub. Serv. Comm'n, 735 P.2d 718,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 425

(Wyo. 1987).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 37-1-103.
Assessment of interstate public utilities generally.

The public service commission of Wyoming is hereby authorized and empowered to collect for the actual costs incurred by the commission for necessary and reasonable services, investigations and other actions concerning the construction, operation, maintenance, safety and environment of interstate utilities and their facilities within Wyoming. This act [section] shall not apply to motor carriers or any services, investigations or other actions authorized by the statutes for intrastate utilities.

The billing by the commission shall be directed to the involved interstate utility or utilities at intervals of no less than thirty (30) days as determined by the commission and shall detail and show the basis for the charges and all direct and allocated charges. Payment shall be made by the interstate public utility no later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the billing. Only those charges which are necessary and reasonable need be paid and if charges not necessary and reasonable are paid under protest, they may be recovered in a court of competent jurisdiction in any action commenced against the public service commission of Wyoming within thirty (30) days after payment under protest and any amount recovered shall be paid out of the public service commission account.

The funds collected shall be immediately remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the public service commission account. The commission may immediately upon deposit expend such monies for payment of its costs incurred concerning interstate utilities, subject to the warrant of the state auditor, upon submission of properly executed vouchers authorized by the commission in the same manner as other funds are disbursed subject to other provisions of law.

Any interstate utility which violates or fails to comply with any provision of this act shall be subject to a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each and every offense.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 90, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of (b); and substituted “public service commission account” for “earmarked revenue fund” in (c).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 37-1-104.
Reorganization of public utility; definition; approval.

No reorganization of a public utility shall take place without prior approval by the public service commission. The commission shall not approve any proposed reorganization if the commission finds, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing, that the reorganization will adversely affect the utility’s ability to serve the public.

For purposes of this section, “reorganization” means any transaction which, regardless of the means by which it is accomplished, results in a change in the majority ownership interest or control of a public utility, or the majority ownership interest or control of any entity which owns a majority interest in or controls a public utility. “Reorganization” as used in this section shall not include a mortgage or pledge transaction entered into to secure a bona fide borrowing by the party granting the mortgage or making the pledge.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 121, § 1; 2015 ch. 105, § 1, effective March 3, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), rewrote the first sentence, clarifying the meaning of “reorganization” to include majority ownership interest or control in the definition.

Laws 2015, ch. 105, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

§ 37-1-105.
Application for reorganization; fees; reimbursement of costs and expenses to state; expenses not to be included in rates.

Every applicant for approval of a reorganization by the public service commission under this act [§§

37-1-104

through

37-1-106

] shall pay a filing fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each application and ten dollars ($10.00) plus ten cents ($.10) per page for every amendment to any application. These fees shall be deposited in the general fund. In addition the applicant shall reimburse the state for the expenses of the state in reviewing and acting upon each application and defending any public service commission decision in case of legal appeal. The expenses of the state shall not be deemed to include the normal salary and benefits of the public service commissioners but shall include substantially all other actual expenses of the state in connection with the application. The public service commission may require the applicant to post a bond or make a prepayment to assure the required reimbursement. No charge for expenses in connection with any application under this act may be included in the rates charged to Wyoming customers. The reimbursements collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account and may be expended by the public service commission following appropriations by the legislature.

No charge for any expenses of any reorganization shall be included in the rate base of any Wyoming public utility.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 121, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “separate account” for “trust and agency account” in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 37-1-106.
Rulemaking authority.

The public service commission shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of W.S.

37-1-104

and

37-1-105

.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 121, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Indian Reserved Water Rights, Federalism and the Trust Responsibility,” see XXVII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1992).

§ 37-1-107.
Department of transportation; appeals.

Any party in interest or any person or party authorized under chapters 9 through 11 of title 37 to file for an original hearing before the department of transportation may appeal to a hearing panel appointed by the transportation commission in the same manner, and to the same extent, as provided in the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 2; 1993, ch. 68, § 2.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).